North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53C. Regulation of Banks.
Article 6. Bank Operations.
§ 53C-6-15.
Establishment of branches.

A bank may establish one or more branches in this State, whether de novo or by acquisition of existing branches of another depository institution, with the prior written approval of the Commissioner. The Commissioner’s approval may be given or withheld, in the Commissioner’s discretion, in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

A bank may establish branches in another state, whether de novo or by acquisition of existing branches of another depository institution, in accordance with the provisions of applicable federal law and the laws of the other state, upon prior written approval of the Commissioner. The Commissioner’s approval may be given or withheld in the Commissioner’s discretion in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

A bank seeking authority to establish a branch shall make application to the Commissioner in a form acceptable to the Commissioner. Not more than 30 days before nor less than 10 days after the filing of the application with the Commissioner, the applicant shall publish public notice of the filing of the application. The public notice shall contain all of the following:

A statement that the application has been filed with the Commissioner.

The physical address or location of the proposed branch, including street and city or town.

A statement that any interested person may make written comment on the application to the Commissioner and that comments received by the Commissioner within 14 days of the date of publication of the public notice shall be considered. The public notice shall provide the then current mailing address of the Commissioner.

A bank may conduct any activities at a branch in another state authorized under this section that are permissible for a bank chartered by the other state where the branch is located, except to the extent the activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this State or by any rule or order of the Commissioner applicable to the bank.

Upon receipt of an application to establish a branch, the Commissioner shall conduct an examination of the pertinent facts and information and may request such additional information as the Commissioner deems necessary to make a decision on the application. In deciding whether to approve a branch application, the Commissioner shall take into account such factors as the financial condition and history of the applicant; the adequacy of its capital; the applicant’s future earnings prospects; the character, competency, and experience of its management; the probable impact of the branch on the condition of the applicant bank and existing depository institutions in the community to be served; and the convenience and needs of the community the proposed branch is to serve.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-16.
Change of location of a branch or principal office.

A bank may change the location of its principal office or a branch with the prior written approval of the Commissioner. A request to relocate the principal office or a branch of a bank shall be made in a form acceptable to the Commissioner and shall include information regarding the reason for the proposed relocation, the distance and direction of the move, and such other information as the Commissioner may require in order to reach a decision in the matter.

Not more than 30 days before nor less than 10 days after filing a request to relocate the principal office or a branch of a bank, the applicant shall publish public notice of the request. The public notice shall contain all of the following:

A statement that the request has been filed with the Commissioner.

The physical address of the principal office or branch to be relocated and the physical address of the proposed new location.

A statement that any interested person may make written comment on the request to the Commissioner and that comments received by the Commissioner within 14 days of the date of publication of the public notice will be considered. The statement shall provide the then current mailing address of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall approve a request to relocate the principal office or a branch of a bank if the relocation is to a site within the same vicinity as the original location, or does not result in a material change in the primary service area of the principal office or branch, or is considered important to the economic viability of the bank or the branch, or is otherwise found not to be inconsistent with the public need and convenience.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-17.
Branch closings.

A bank may close a branch upon providing written notice to the Commissioner and the customers of the branch at least 90 days prior to the proposed closing. The notice shall include the date the branch will close and posting, in a conspicuous manner on the branch premises for a period of 30 days prior to the proposed closing date, a notice of its intent to close the branch. The consolidation of two or more branches into a single location in the same vicinity shall not be considered a closure subject to the 90-day and 30-day notice requirements of this section. To be considered a consolidation, the bank shall request consolidation treatment from the Commissioner, who shall decide, in his or her discretion, whether the branches to be consolidated are considered to be in the same vicinity, with due consideration to the distance between the branches and the nature of the market in which the branches are situated.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-18.
Non-branch bank business offices.

A bank may establish in this State or another state one or more non-branch bank business offices as defined by G.S. 53C-1-4(46), subject to the following requirements:

If a proposed non-branch bank business office will be used in connection with a new activity for which an application is required under G.S. 53C-5-1(d) or an investment for which a notice is required under G.S. 53C-5-2(e), that application or notice shall include written notification of the intent to open the office. The notification shall include the proposed location of the office and a description of the business to be conducted at the office. If the Commissioner does not request additional information or object to its establishment within 10 days of the date of receipt of the notification, the non-branch bank business office shall be deemed approved. In deciding whether to object to the establishment of a non-branch bank business office, the Commissioner shall consider, without limitation, whether the business proposed to be conducted at the non-branch bank business office is permissible for a bank, the costs of its establishment and ongoing operation and the impact of the costs on the bank’s capital and profitability, and the ability of the bank’s management to conduct the proposed business.

If written notification is not required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the bank shall provide the Commissioner with written notification of the location of the office and a description of the business to be conducted at the office.

An out-of-state bank may establish and operate a non-branch bank business office in this State upon written notice to the Commissioner.

A bank or an out-of-state bank may close a non-branch bank business office at any time with notice to the Commissioner.

No deposits may be taken at a non-branch bank business office.

History.

2012-56, s. 4; 2017-165, s. 8.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-165, s. 8, effective July 21, 2017, rewrote subsection (a).

§ 53C-6-19.
Operations; suspension.

A bank, any of its branches, and any of its non-branch bank business offices may operate on such days and during such hours, and may observe such holidays, as the bank’s board of directors shall designate.

Whenever the Commissioner determines that an emergency exists or is pending in this State or any part thereof, the Commissioner may authorize banks operating in the affected area or areas to suspend any or all of their operations in such area or areas for such period or periods as the Commissioner establishes. An emergency is any condition or occurrence that may interfere with a bank’s operations or poses an existing or imminent threat to the safety or security of persons or property, or both.

In the event that an emergency exists or is pending in this State or any part thereof and a bank operating in the affected area or areas is unable to communicate the existence or pendency of the emergency to the OCOB, an officer of the bank may suspend any or all of the bank’s operations in the affected area or areas without the prior approval of the Commissioner. The bank shall give notice of such closing to the Commissioner as soon as practicable.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-20.
Savings promotion raffles.

A bank may offer a savings promotion raffle in which the sole consideration required for a chance of winning designated prizes is the deposit of a minimum specified amount of money in a savings account or other savings program offered by the bank. A bank shall maintain records sufficient to facilitate an audit of the savings promotion raffle, shall conduct the savings promotion raffle in a safe and sound manner, and shall fully disclose the terms and conditions of the promotion to account holders and prospective account holders of the bank.

History.

2019-173, s. 2(b).